test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_oneform_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    sovášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soovááš
    tu]ášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuššááš
    siävŋášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävŋáš
    aibâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaibâš
    tarbâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taarbâš
    tedâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teeddâš
    kuodâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuoddâš
    haldâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haaldâš
    hardâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haardâš
    vardâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaardâš
    kirdâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiirdâč
    sirdâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siirdâš
    vuordâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuordâš
    jurdâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juurdâš
    navdâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: naavdâš
    lovdâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loovdâš
    čovdâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čoovdâš
    argâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aargâš
    leihâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leeihâš
    merhâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meerhâš
    mađhâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maađhâš
    ejâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eejâš
    pajâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaijâš
    sojâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soojâš
    vavjâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaavjâš
    njuoskâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuoskâš
    kalâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaalâš
    čalâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaalâš
    elâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eelâš
    kolmâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koolmâš
    omâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oomâš
    mainâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maainâš
    ruoinâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruoinâš
    kavpâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaavpâš
    kuoirâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuoirâš
    korâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koorâš
    nuorâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nuorrâš
    tivrâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiivrâš
    posâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poosâš
    kesâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keessâč
    kesâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keessâš
    kiesâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiessâč
    kiesâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiessâš
    mavsâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maavsâš
    satâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saatâš
    rahtâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: raahtâš
    muotâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muotâš
    hastâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haastâš
    rantustâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rantustâš
    muštâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuštâš
    arvâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aarvâš
    korvâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koorvâš
    pevâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peevvâč
    juovâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juovvâš
    vazâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaazzâš
    pođâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poođâš
    cápcudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cápcudâđâđ
    počâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pooččâš
    mučâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuččâš
